Wisconsin, session 2025, SB898.
do enact as follows:SB898,13Section 1. 15.405 (9) of the statutes is renumbered 15.405 (9) (intro.) and 4amended to read:SB898,2,2515.405 (9) Pharmacy examining board. (intro.) There is created a 6pharmacy examining board in the department of safety and professional services. 1The pharmacy examining board shall consist consisting of the following 7 9 2members appointed for staggered 4-year terms.:SB898,2,43(a) Five of the members shall be who are licensed to practice pharmacy in this 4state pharmacists under ch. 450.SB898,2,55(e) Two members shall be public members.SB898,26Section 2. 15.405 (9) (b) of the statutes is created to read:SB898,2,8715.405 (9) (b) Two members who are registered pharmacy technicians under 8ch. 450.SB898,39Section 3. Nonstatutory provisions.SB898,2,1210(1) Notwithstanding the length of terms specified in s. 15.405 (9) (intro.), the 11initial members of the pharmacy examining board appointed under s. 15.405 (9) (b) 12shall be appointed for the following terms:SB898,2,1413(a) One of the initial members shall be appointed for a term expiring on July 141, 2028.SB898,2,1615(b) One of the initial members shall be appointed for a term expiring on July 161, 2030.SB898,2,1717